src/fastspell_dictionaries/sc_IT.dic
abbréngula/m
aberri/Wzxb
acarignare/Lb
achibudhire/Ubl
aciviri/Vlpb
acollire/Ub
acóssia/m
acrucudhiri/Vlpb
acucadozu/AZa
acúsalu/vg
adelantai/Jukb
aèreu/DZag
afallidu/DZl
afódhia/m
aggarramentu/AZa
aggollire/Ub
aggrighidhiri/Vlpb
agiocai/Jukb
aletiau/AZa
àlida/m
allegrútzulu/DZl
allichidiri/Vlpb
ammàtula/m
ammedhigare/Lb
ammirallu/AZag
ammunire/Ub
anchiedha/AZa
Andria/c
Annica/c
annichilamentu/AZa
annótinu/DZh
annuellai/Jukbl
Antiogu/c
Antoni/c
Antonica/c
Anzeledha/c
aparàgula/m
aparteni/ib
apiatare/Lb
apicinniri/Vlpb
apisidhiri/Vlpb
apússia/m
arbiaxu/AZa
arghenteri/AZal
arranzolu/BZah
arregonai/Jukb
arrichiri/Vlp
arrivada/AZa
arromadiau/AZa
arrujire/Ub
assistiri/Vlpb
assuermai/Jukb
astengu/lp
asteni/ib
asurpiri/Vlpb
atèmpera/mn
atraessone/GZh
atriviri/Vlpb
atropedhiada/AZa
atuldire/Ub
aviliri/Vlpb
avrigai/Jukb
badhinu/AZa
baldedu/AZal
bai/def
baxi/def
baxei/def
bandhare/Lbg
bandhu/AZag
bannire/Ub
bardellinu/AZa
bassu/DZg
batiri/Vlpb
benenu/AZag
benni/ib
bidei/def
binzedha/AZa
bírdiu/DZg
birgonzile/AZal
biri/W
boale/BZa
bóghina/m
bótzica/AZah
brunchiri/Vlp
budhiri/Vlpb
burdelleri/IZl
cagallente/AZa
calamistru/AZa
calandrai/Jukb
cambiare/Pbg
cangrenosu/DZh
cària/m
cavacu/AZa
chésciu/AZa
chimire/Ub
cinniri/Vlp
coberri/Wzxb
colpu/CZag
comúnica/mn
condúsiu/Db
congiobraxu/AZa
consizeri/IZl
consumire/Ub
coronaxu/AZah
costiarvu/AZa
costituiri/Vlp
costúmene/AZah
crai/AZag
cuberri/Wzxb
cumbenni/ib
cumbertícula/AZa
cumparri/Wzxb
cumpartziri/Ub
cunfetera/AZah
cusiri/Vlp
dannificare/Pb
definire/Ub
deista/AZa
desmerèsciu/lb
disatinata/AZah
discuntentesa/AZah
disizosu/DZh
dispidiri/Vlpb
dividire/Ub
dolimadore/GZ
drommiri/Vlpb
duritosu/DZh
esàmina/mn
estremessiri/Vlp
Europa/c
Evagnelu/Zac
Evangéliu/Zac
Evanzéliu/Zac
fàghere/AZag
faltizu/AZah
farmare/Lb
feminarzu/AZa
ferri/Wzxb
filiri/Vlpb
fiore/BZa
fiorire/Ub
forru/BZag
forti/AZag
fossu/CZag
fregurosu/DZh
friri/Vlp
fugiri/Vlp
furriata/AZah
gargatu/AZa
gedra/CZa
ghirata/AZah
giannire/Ub
ibetai/Jukb
illanzire/Ub
illegiri/Vlp
illezériga/m
imbefa/AZa
imbestiri/Vlpb
imbozire/Ubh
imbucatògia/AZa
immalaidare/Lb
Impera/c
impilire/Ub
impiliri/Vlpb
imprenni/ib
impressiri/Vlpb
inaspressiri/Vlp
incantera/AZah
inciulai/Jukb
inciuriri/Vlp
increbucire/Ub
incrichiri/Vlp
indíssia/m
infloriri/Vlpb
infrichiri/Vlp
infriciri/Vlp
ingiogatzidu/DZh
ingranire/Ub
ingrinare/Lb
innegàbbili/AZa
insighiri/Vlp
interveni/i
intestore/AZah
intratengu/lp
intretenni/ib
intumbire/Ub
intzídia/m
intzighiri/Vlp
irdalai/Jukb
irfilusau/AZa
irmurtire/Ub
irvérzina/m
iscalabrone/AZah
iscarronare/Lb
iscoberri/Wzxb
iscobertu/DZ
iscópiu/Jukm
iscoragiri/Vlp
iscosire/Ub
iscotzesu/DZh
iscumparri/Wzxb
isdeinare/Lb
ismaltiri/Vlp
ispedhiai/Jukbh
ispediri/Vlpb
ispéria/m
isportinada/AZa
isprantellare/Lb
isputzire/Ub
isterri/Wzxb
istoighiu/AZa
istumbata/AZah
isturdiri/Ub
istútura/mn
isvrembare/Lb
lisamentu/AZa
lodhu/DZ
lughi/AZag
luiri/Vlpb
mantèngiu/l
mantengu/lp
mantenni/ib
matibbullosu/DZ
mazina/AZag
média/mn
melone/BZa
minai/Jukbg
mindigai/Jukb
morri/Wzxb
muristedhu/AZa
muru/CZag
nànniga/m
níchili/AZa
nudriri/Vlpb
nutrire/Ub
oberri/Wzxb
oferri/Wxb
ofèrgiu/lpX
óldini/AZag
oprimiri/Vlp
oteni/ib
ovíparu/DZ
palitzada/AZag
parri/Wzxb
pasturare/Lb
pedestàgiu/AZa
peniténtzia/mn
percossosu/DZl
pídicu/DZ
pilu/CZag
pònniri/g
possidiri/Vlpb
pràdiga/AZa
preferri/Wzxb
prenni/ib
presidiri/Vlp
presumire/Ub
preveni/ib
pricontu/AZa
profumera/AZah
protègiu/lb
púlica/m
púntalu/vg
putare/Kb
retaldu/AZa
revolussioneri/IZ
riuniri/Vlp
rupire/Ub
sapiri/Vlpb
scairi/Vlp
schinniri/Vlp
sciloriau/AZa
scimiri/Vlp
sciri/W
scoberri/Wzxb
scosciomingiada/AZa
scruai/Jukb
scumparri/Wzxb
sègheda/m
sentiri/Vlpb
serviri/Vlpb
sfadhiri/Vlp
sinnàlalu/vg
smarriri/Vlp
sodighiri/Vlp
soridore/GZ
sparri/Wzxb
spartziri/Vlpb
spraudiri/Vlp
spurtiri/Vlp
starruta/AZa
stríngiu/lb
strobiri/Vlp
sufriri/Vlpb
sumire/Ub
supentire/Ub
susteni/ib
tascaresu/DZ
tempus/g
tenni/ib
tomaritu/AZa
tópiga/m
tratazu/AZah
trateni/ib
trepedhosu/DZl
tressiri/Vlpb
trúmbula/m
tumbire/Ub
tuviri/Vlpb
tzirigherta/AZa
Udrone/c
urinèglia/AZa
zéniu/AZag
